Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-743
Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered support order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 43;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 41.

Pursuant to this section, a litigant is precluded from raising an equitable estoppel defense to challenge the enforcement or modification of a foreign support order once the foreign order has been confirmed pursuant to section 42-742. Trogdon v. Trogdon, 18 Neb. App. 313, 780 N.W.2d 45 (2010).